North Carolina, session 2025, HB1053.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of twenty-eight million six hundred thousand dollars ($28,600,000)
in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to increase the amount
appropriated for the Classroom Materials/Instructional Supplies/Equipment allotment.
SECTION 1.(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to increase the
appropriations from the General Fund to the Department of Public Instruction to be used to
increase the amount appropriated for the Classroom Materials/Instructional Supplies/Equipment
allotment by the following amounts:
(1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the sum of fifteen million one
hundred thousand dollars ($15,100,000) in recurring funds.
(2) Beginning with the 2028-2029 fiscal year, the sum of twenty-two million six
hundred thousand dollars ($22,600,000) in recurring funds.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1053-v-1*